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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC C0200 /3 1 toC02 15 / 3 4 SpeedSensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The speed sensor detects wheel speed and sends the ap-
propriate signals to the ECU. These signals are used for control
of theABScontrol system.The frontand rear rotorseachhave
48 serrations.
When the rotors rotate, themagnetic fieldemittedby theperma-
nent magnet in the speed sensor generates AC voltage. Since
the frequency of this AC voltage changes in direct proportion to
the speed of the rotor, the frequency is used by the ECU to de-
tect the speed of each wheel.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0200 /3 1
C0205 / 32
C0210 / 33
C0215 / 34

Detectionofanyof theconditions 1. through4.:
1.Atavehiclespeedof 10km/h (6mph)ormore,pulses

arenot input for 15sec.
2. Momentary interruption of the speed sensor signal oc-

curs at least 7 times in the time between switching the
ignition switch ON and switching it OFF.

3. Continuous noise occurs into the speed sensor signals
withavehiclespeedat20km/h ( 12mph)ormore.

4.Thecondition that thespeedsensorsignalcircuit is
opencontinues for0. 12sec.ormore.

SABSdoesnot function
SBrakepedal isnotdepressed
SParkingbrake isnotset
SReardifferentialdoesnot lock
Under the above conditions, when the difference in velocity
between the highest rotating and the second highest rotat-
ingwheels iswithin2km/h ( 1.2mph), theslowestwheel
rotates at 0 km/h (0 mph), and the second slowest wheel
rotatesat 12km/h (7.5mph) for 1 secondormore.

SRight front, left front, right rearand left rearspeedsensor
SEachspeedsensorcircuit
SSensor rotor

HINT:
DTCNo.C0200 /3 1 are for the right frontspeedsensor.
DTC No. C0205 / 32 are for the left front speed sensor.
DTCNo.C02 10 /33are for the right rearspeedsensor.
DTCNo.C02 15 /34are for the left rearspeedsensor.
Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the speed sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
Start the inspection fromstep 1 whenusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2whennotusing the
hand−held tester.

1 Checkoutputvalueofspeedsensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand held tester to the DLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitch to theONpositionandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check that there is no difference between the speed value output from the speed sensor displayed on the
hand−held testerand thespeedvaluedisplayedon thespeedometerwhendriving thevehicle.
OK:

There is almost no difference between displayed speed value.
HINT:
There is toleranceof ± 10%in thespeedometer indication.

OK Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG

2 Check speed sensor.

FRONT:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector’s

locking part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect the speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
LH Side:
Measure resistancebetween terminals 1 and3of thespeed
sensorconnector.
RH side:
Measure resistancebetween terminals 1 and2of thespeed
sensor connector.
OK:

Resistance:0.92 to 1.22k �

CHECK:
LH Side:
Measure resistancebetween terminal 1 or3of thespeedsen-
sor connector and body ground.
RH Side:
Measure resistancebetween terminal 1 or2of thespeedsen-
sor connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 10 k� orhigher
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REAR:
PREPARATION:
(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector ’s

locking part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of the speed
sensor connector.
OK:

Resistance: 1.0 to 1.4 k�
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of the speed sen-
sor connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 10 k� or higher

NG Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check t he speed sensor si gnal af t er r epl acement ( See
page DI−54).

OK

3 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each speed
sensor and ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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4 Check sensor installation.

CHECK:
Check the speed sensor installation.
OK:

The installation bolt is tightened properly and there is
no clearance between the sensor and front steering
knuckle or rear axle carrier.
Torque: (Front speed sensor)
8.0 N·m (82 kgf·cm, 71 in.·lbf)

NG Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check t he speed sensor si gnal af t er r epl acement ( See
page DI−54).

OK

5 Check speed sensor and sensor rotor serrations.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the ABS ECU.
(b) Connect the oscilloscope to each of terminals FR+, FL+,

RR+ or RL+ and GND of the ABS ECU.
CHECK:
Drive the vehicle at about 20 km/h (12 mph), and check the sig-
nal waveform.
OK:
A waveform as shown in a figure should be output.
HINT:
S As vehicle speed (wheel revolution speed) increases, a

cycle of waveform narrows and the fluctuation in the out-
put voltage becomes greater.

S When noise is identified in the waveform on the oscillo-
scope, error signals are generated due to the speed sen-
sor rotors scratches, looseness or foreign matter on it.

OK Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG
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6 Check sensor rotor and sensor tip.

FRONT:
PREPARATION:
(a) RFS:

Remove the steering axle shaft.
(b) IFS:

Remove the front drive shaft.
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No foreign matter or missing teeth.
PREPARATION:
Remove the front speed sensor.
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No foreign matter on the sensor tip.
REAR:
PREPARATION:
(a) RFS:

Remove the rear axle hub.
(b) IFS:

Remove the rear axle shaft.
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No foreign matter or missing teeth.
PREPARATION:
Remove the rear speed sensor.
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No foreign matter on the sensor tip.

NG Replace speed sensor or rotor.

NOTICE:
Check t he speed sensor si gnal af t er r epl acement ( See
page DI−54).

OK

Check and replace ABS ECU.


